New York, session 2025-2026, S7255.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 510.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 7 to read as follows: 3 7. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any provision of 4 law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the court shall remand any 5 principal that is not a citizen of the United States or a noncitizen 6 lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States to the 7 custody of the sheriff, if such principal is charged with a felony. Such 8 remand shall not be revoked or otherwise terminated until the completion 9 of judicial proceedings related to such crime. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 11 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11487-01-5